dev/turkic.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="utf-8"?>

<dictionary>

  <alphabet>
    <bak>АБВГҒДҘЕЁЖЗИЙКҠЛМНҢОӨПРСҪТУҮФХҺЦЧШЩЪЫЬЭӘЮЯабвгғдҙеёжзийкҡлмнңоөпрсҫтуүфхһцчшщъыьэәюя</bak>
    <krc>АаБбВвГгДдЕеЁёЖжЗзИиЙйКкЛлМмНнОоПпРрСсТтУуФфХхЦцЧчШшЩщЪъЫыЬьЭэЮюЯя</krc>
    <tat>АӘБВГДЕЁЖҖЗИЙКЛМНҢОӨПРСТУҮФХҺЦЧШЩЪЫЬЭЮЯаәбвгдеёжҗзийклмнңоөпрстуүфхһцчшщъыьэюя</tat>
  </alphabet>

  <sdefs>

    <sdef n="n" c="Noun" a="all">
      <kaz n="Зат есім"/>
      <tat n="Исем"/>
    </sdef>

    <sdef n="pih" c="Past habitual" a="kaz;kir">
      <kaz c="Ауыспалы өткен шақ" c="-{E}т{I}н-" c="Онлар жазатын."/>
    </sdef>
  </sdefs>

  <pardefs>

    <pardef n="CASE" a="all">
      <e a="all"><p><l></l><r><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e a="all"><p><l bak="{N}{I}ң" tat="н{I}ң" kaz="{N}{I}ң"/><r><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e a="kaz"><p><l kaz="{M}ен"/><r><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

  </pardefs>
</dictionary>
